Idaho, session 2026, H0878.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 59-1603, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
59-1603. CONFORMITY WITH CLASSIFIED POSITIONS. (1) To the extent pos-
sible, each nonclassified position in the executive department will be paid
a salary or wage comparable to classified positions with similar duties, re-
sponsibilities, training, experience and other qualifications in consulta-
tion with the division of human resources. Temporary employees and agricul-
tural inspectors referred to in subsections (m) and (o) of section 67-5303,
Idaho Code, shall not be entitled to sick leave accruals provided in section
59-1605, Idaho Code, vacation leave provided in section 59-1606, Idaho Code,
or holiday pay defined in subsection (15) of section 67-5302, Idaho Code, un-
less contributions are being made to the public employee retirement system
in accordance with chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated by
the retirement board. Vacation and sick leave accruals, but not holiday pay,
shall be awarded retroactively, if necessary, to the date such employees be-
come eligible for retirement system membership.
(2) To the extent possible, nonclassified state employees in the execu-
tive department reporting to the governor or a board or commission appointed
by the governor shall conform with chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code, defining
the state personnel system, in sections where nonclassified state employee
personnel standards are expressly defined.
(3) To the extent possible, each nonclassified position in the legisla-
tive department will be paid a salary or wage comparable to classified posi-
tions with similar duties, responsibilities, training, experience and other
qualifications.
(4) The supreme court shall determine the schedules of salary and com-
pensation for all officers and employees of the judicial department that are
not otherwise fixed by law. To the extent possible, the supreme court shall
adopt schedules compatible with the state's accounting system. The judicial
department may also maintain personnel records and files under such system
as is ordered by the supreme court.
(5) The state board of education shall determine the schedules of
salary and compensation, and prescribe policies for overtime and compen-
satory time off from duty, for all officers, teaching staff, and employees
of the state board of education as provided by law. To the extent possible,


the state board of education shall adopt schedules and policies compatible
with the state's accounting system. The state board of education may also
maintain personnel records and files under a system of its own, if approved
by the state controller.
(6) Members of the legislature, the lieutenant governor, other offi-
cers whose salaries are fixed by law, and members of part-time boards, com-
missions and committees shall be paid according to law.
(7) Any schedule of salary and compensation must be approved by the ap-
pointing authority and be communicated to the state controller in writing at
least thirty (30) days in advance of the effective date of the schedule.
(8) In addition to salary increases provided by any compensation sched-
ule adopted pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, nonclassified offi-
cers and employees, except those who are elected officials or whose salaries
are fixed by law, may be granted an award not to exceed two thousand dollars
($2,000) in any given fiscal year based on an affirmative certification of
meritorious service. Exceptions to the two-thousand-dollar ($2,000) limit
provided in this section may be granted under extraordinary circumstances if
approved in advance by the state board of examiners. Appointing authorities
shall submit a report to the division of financial management and the leg-
islative services office by October 1 on all awards granted in the preceding
fiscal year.
(9) In addition to salary increases provided by any compensation sched-
ule, nonclassified officers and employees, except those who are elected of-
ficials or whose salaries are fixed by law, may be granted an award not to
exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) in any given fiscal year based on sug-
gestions or recommendations made by the employee that resulted in taxpayer
savings as a result of cost savings or greater efficiencies to the depart-
ment, office or institution or to the state of Idaho in excess of the amount
of the award. Exceptions to the two-thousand-dollar ($2,000) limit provided
in this subsection may be granted in extraordinary circumstances if approved
in advance by the state board of examiners. The appointing authority shall
as near as practicable utilize the criteria in conformance with rules pro-
mulgated by the division of human resources pursuant to section 67-5309D,
Idaho Code. Appointing authorities shall submit a report to the division of
financial management and the legislative services office by October 1 on all
employee suggestion awards granted in the preceding fiscal year. Such re-
port shall include any changes made as a direct result of an employee's sug-
gestion and savings resulting therefrom.
(10) Each appointing authority, including the elective offices in the
executive department, the legislative department, the judicial department,
and the state board of education and the board of regents, shall comply with
all reporting requirements necessary to produce the list of employee posi-
tions prescribed by section 67-3519, Idaho Code.
(11) The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, shall
prescribe personnel policies for all officers and employees of the national
guard that are not otherwise fixed by law. Such policies will include an
employee grievance procedure with appeal to the adjutant general. The ad-
jutant general shall determine schedules of salary and compensation that
are, to the extent possible, comparable to the schedules used for federal
civil service employees of the national guard and those employees serving


in military status. Schedules adopted shall be compatible with the state's
accounting system to the extent possible.
(12) In addition to salary increases provided by any compensation
schedule, nonclassified officers and employees, except those who are
elected officials or whose salaries are fixed by law, may be granted award
pay for recruitment or retention purposes. Retention bonuses require af-
firmative certification of meritorious service after completion of at least
six (6) months of service prior to issuance. Department directors and the
administrator of the division of human resources are authorized to seek
legal remedies available, including deductions from an employee's accrued
vacation funds, from an employee who resigns during the designated period of
time after receipt of a recruitment or retention bonus. Appointing author-
ities shall submit a report to the division of financial management and the
legislative services office by October 1 on all such awards granted in the
preceding fiscal year.
(13) In addition to salary increases provided by any compensation
schedule, nonclassified officers and employees, except those who are
elected officials or whose salaries are fixed by law, may be granted other
pay as provided in this subsection. Appointing authorities shall submit a
report to the division of financial management and the legislative services
office by October 1 on all such awards granted in the preceding fiscal year,
including:
(a) Shift differential pay up to twenty-five percent (25%) of hourly
rates depending on local market rates in order to attract and retain
qualified staff;
(b) Geographic differential pay in areas of the state where recruitment
and retention are difficult due to economic conditions and cost of liv-
ing; and
(c) Wildland firefighter differential pay up to twenty-five percent
(25%) of hourly rates for wildland firefighting personnel who hold
current incident qualification cards while working on the fireline of
a fire incident not deemed controlled or at a fire incident helibase
servicing active flights. Such differential pay shall apply only to
temporary returning seasonal firefighters and temporary first year
seasonal firefighters. Such differential pay shall not apply to per-
manent employees who have a firefighting role or hold current incident
qualification cards.
(14) When necessary to obtain or retain qualified personnel and when a
distribution has been approved for classified employees pursuant to section
67-5309D, Idaho Code, each appointing authority, including the elective of-
fices in the executive branch, the legislative branch, the judicial branch,
and the state board of education and the board of regents of the university of
Idaho, may grant nonclassified employees nonmerit pay in the same proportion
as received by classified employees in that department or institution. Ap-
pointing authorities shall submit a report to the division of financial man-
agement and the legislative services office by October 1 on all such awards
granted in the preceding fiscal year.
(15) Each appointing authority shall, as nearly as practicable, utilize
the criteria for reimbursement of moving expenses in conformance with sec-
tion 67-5337, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated by the division of human re-


sources pursuant thereto. Appointing authorities shall submit a report to
the division of financial management and the legislative services office by
October 1 on all moving reimbursements granted in the preceding fiscal year.
(16) Specific pay codes shall be established and maintained in the state
controller's office to ensure accurate reporting and monitoring of all pay
actions authorized in this section.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-5309D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5309D. OTHER PAY DELIVERY OPTIONS. (1) In addition to pay increases
authorized in section 67-5309B, Idaho Code, the department director may
grant a classified employee bonus pay not to exceed two thousand dollars
($2,000) in any given fiscal year based on exemplary performance. Excep-
tions to the two-thousand-dollar ($2,000) limit provided in this subsection
may be granted in extraordinary circumstances if approved in advance by the
state board of examiners. Departments shall submit a report to the division
of financial management and the legislative services office by October 1 on
all bonuses granted in the preceding fiscal year.
(2) In addition to pay increases authorized in section 67-5309B, Idaho
Code, the department director may grant a classified employee an award pay-
ment based on suggestions or recommendations made by the employee that re-
sulted in taxpayer savings as a result of cost savings or greater efficien-
cies to the department or to the state of Idaho in excess of the amount of the
award and in compliance with the rules for employee suggestion awards pro-
mulgated by the division of human resources. The award may be an amount up to
twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount determined to be the dollar savings
to the state, but not in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000). Exceptions
to the two-thousand-dollar ($2,000) limit provided in this subsection may be
granted in extraordinary circumstances if approved in advance by the state
board of examiners. Departments shall submit a report to the division of fi-
nancial management and the legislative services office by October 1 on all
employee suggestion awards granted in the preceding fiscal year. Such re-
port shall include any changes made as a direct result of an employee's sug-
gestion and savings resulting therefrom.
(3) In addition to pay increases authorized in section 67-5309B, Idaho
Code, the department director may grant award pay to a classified employee
for recruitment or retention purposes. Retention bonuses require comple-
tion of at least six (6) months of achieving performance standards prior to
issuance. The department director and the administrator of the division of
human resources are authorized to seek legal remedies available, including
deductions from an employee's accrued vacation funds, from an employee who
resigns during the designated period of time after receipt of a recruitment
or retention bonus. Departments shall submit a report to the division of fi-
nancial management and the legislative services office by October 1 on all
such awards granted in the preceding fiscal year.
(4) In addition to pay increases authorized in section 67-5309B, Idaho
Code, department directors may provide a classified employee other nonper-
formance-related pay as provided in this subsection. Departments shall sub-
mit a report to the division of financial management and the legislative ser-


vices office by October 1 on all such awards granted in the preceding fiscal
year, including:
(a) Shift differential pay up to twenty-five percent (25%) of hourly
rates depending on local market rates in order to attract and retain
qualified staff;
(b) Geographic differential pay in areas of the state where recruitment
and retention of qualified staff are difficult due to economic condi-
tions and cost of living; and
(c) Wildland firefighter differential pay up to twenty-five percent
(25%) of hourly rates for wildland firefighting personnel who hold
current incident qualification cards while working on the fireline of
a fire incident not deemed controlled or at a fire incident helibase
servicing active flights. Such differential pay shall apply only to
temporary returning seasonal firefighters and temporary first year
seasonal firefighters. Such differential pay shall not apply to per-
manent employees who have a firefighting role or hold current incident
qualification cards.
Employees in the same classification who are similarly situated shall be
treated consistently in respect to shift differential and geographic pay
differential.
(5) When necessary to obtain or retain qualified personnel in a partic-
ular classification, upon petition of the department to the administrator
containing acceptable reasons therefor, a higher temporary pay grade may be
authorized by the administrator that, if granted, shall be reviewed annually
to determine the need for continuance.
(6) In unusual circumstances, with prior approval from the administra-
tors of the division of human resources and the division of financial manage-
ment, agencies may grant nonperformance-related pay to employees, which in
no case may exceed five percent (5%) of an employee's base pay. Departments
shall submit a report to the division of financial management and the leg-
islative services office by October 1 on all such awards granted in the pre-
ceding fiscal year.
(7) Specific pay codes shall be established and maintained in the state
controller's office to ensure accurate reporting and monitoring of all pay
actions authorized in this section.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.